Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-830
Bridges in or near two or more counties; joint contracts; judgment; board members individually liable, when.

Any judgment so recovered against the county board of either of such counties shall be a charge on such county, unless the jury shall in their verdict certify that the neglect or refusal of such board was willful or malicious, in which case only the members of such board shall be personally liable for such judgment; and the same may be enforced against them in their personal and individual capacity, and upon their official bonds.

Laws 1879, § 90, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 2991;

C.S.1922, § 2742;

C.S.1929, § 39-828;

R.S.1943, § 39-830.